Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-181
Person eighteen years of age or younger; penalty; copy of abstract to Director of Motor Vehicles; possible alcohol overdose; actions authorized.

(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (3), (4), and (5) of this section, the penalty for violation of section 53-180.02 by a person eighteen years of age or younger shall be as follows:

(a) If the person convicted or adjudicated of violating such section has one or more licenses or permits issued under the Motor Vehicle Operator's License Act:

(i) For the first offense, such person is guilty of a Class III misdemeanor and the court may, as a part of the judgment of conviction or adjudication, impound any such licenses or permits for thirty days and require such person to attend an alcohol education class;

(ii) For a second offense, such person is guilty of a Class III misdemeanor and the court, as a part of the judgment of conviction or adjudication, may (A) impound any such licenses or permits for ninety days and (B) require such person to complete no fewer than twenty and no more than forty hours of community service and to attend an alcohol education class; and

(iii) For a third or subsequent offense, such person is guilty of a Class III misdemeanor and the court, as a part of the judgment of conviction or adjudication, may (A) impound any such licenses or permits for twelve months and (B) require such person to complete no fewer than sixty hours of community service, to attend an alcohol education class, and to submit to an alcohol assessment by a licensed alcohol and drug counselor; and

(b) If the person convicted or adjudicated of violating such section does not have a permit or license issued under the Motor Vehicle Operator's License Act:

(i) For the first offense, such person is guilty of a Class III misdemeanor and the court, as part of the judgment of conviction or adjudication, may (A) prohibit such person from obtaining any permit or any license pursuant to the act for which such person would otherwise be eligible until thirty days after the date of such order and (B) require such person to attend an alcohol education class;

(ii) For a second offense, such person is guilty of a Class III misdemeanor and the court, as part of the judgment of conviction or adjudication, may (A) prohibit such person from obtaining any permit or any license pursuant to the act for which such person would otherwise be eligible until ninety days after the date of such order and (B) require such person to complete no fewer than twenty hours and no more than forty hours of community service and to attend an alcohol education class; and

(iii) For a third or subsequent offense, such person is guilty of a Class III misdemeanor and the court, as part of the judgment of conviction or adjudication, may (A) prohibit such person from obtaining any permit or any license pursuant to the act for which such person would otherwise be eligible until twelve months after the date of such order and (B) require such person to complete no fewer than sixty hours of community service, to attend an alcohol education class, and to submit to an alcohol assessment by a licensed alcohol and drug counselor.

(2) A copy of an abstract of the court's conviction or adjudication shall be transmitted to the Director of Motor Vehicles pursuant to sections 60-497.01 to 60-497.04.

(3) Subsection (1) of this section shall not apply if the person:

(a) Made a good faith request for emergency medical assistance in response to the possible alcohol overdose of himself or herself or another person as soon as the emergency situation is apparent after such violation of section 53-180.02;

(b) Made the request for medical assistance under subdivision (a) of this subsection as soon as the emergency situation is apparent after such violation of section 53-180.02; and

(c) When emergency medical assistance was requested for the possible alcohol overdose of another person:

(i) Remained on the scene until the medical assistance arrived; and

(ii) Cooperated with medical assistance and law enforcement personnel.

(4) The exception from criminal liability provided in subsection (3) of this section applies to any person who makes a request for emergency medical assistance and complies with the requirements of subsection (3) of this section.

(5) Subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to the person experiencing a possible alcohol overdose if a request for emergency medical assistance in response to such possible alcohol overdose was made by another person in compliance with subsection (3) of this section.

(6) A person shall not initiate or maintain an action against a peace officer or the employing state agency or political subdivision based on the officer's compliance with subsection (3), (4), or (5) of this section.

Laws 2010, LB258, § 3;

Laws 2015, LB439, § 2;

Laws 2018, LB923, § 3.

Motor Vehicle Operator's License Act, see section 60-462.